Maryland, session 2026, HB0346.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Labor and Employment
9–670.
(a) In this Part XI of this subtitle the following words have the meanings
indicated.
(b) “Disabled” means rendered unable as the result of an accidental personal
injury or an occupational disease to perform work for which the person was previously
qualified.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0346*

HOUSE BILL 346
(C) “MAXIMUM MEDICAL IMPROVEMENT” MEANS THE POINT IN THE
MEDICAL RECOVERY OF A COVERED EMPLOYEE WHEN THE COVERED EMPLOYEE
HAS ATTAINED STABILITY FROM AN ACCIDENTAL PERSONAL INJURY OR AN
OCCUPATIONAL DISEASE, AND FURTHER HEALING OR RECOVERY IS NOT
ANTICIPATED TO OCCUR WITH CONTINUED TREATMENT, THOUGH THE COVERED
EMPLOYEE MAY REQUIRE ONGOING MEDICAL CARE.
[(c)] (D) “Suitable gainful employment” means employment, including
self–employment, that restores the disabled covered employee, to the extent possible, to the
level of support at the time of:
(1) if an accidental personal injury, the accidental personal injury; or
(2) if an occupational disease, disablement from the occupational disease.
[(d)] (E) “Vocational assessment” means:
(1) collecting and analyzing each of the economic, educational, legal,
medical, social, and vocational circumstances of a disabled covered employee, including the
present mental and physical ability of the covered employee to participate in vocational
rehabilitation services; and
(2) determining the appropriate vocational rehabilitation services
reasonably necessary to return the disabled covered employee to suitable gainful
employment.
[(e)] (F) (1) “Vocational rehabilitation services” means professional services
reasonably necessary during or after or both during and after medical treatment to enable
a disabled covered employee, as soon as practical, to secure suitable gainful employment.
(2) “Vocational rehabilitation services” includes:
(i) coordination of medical services;
(ii) vocational assessment;
(iii) vocational evaluation;
(iv) vocational counseling;
(v) vocational rehabilitation plan development;
(vi) vocational rehabilitation plan monitoring;
(vii) vocational rehabilitation training;

HOUSE BILL 346 3
(viii) job development; and
(ix) job placement.
9–674.
(a) The employer or its insurer shall pay the expenses of the vocational
assessment and vocational rehabilitation services of a covered employee.
(b) (1) While a covered employee is receiving vocational rehabilitation
services, the employer or its insurer shall pay compensation to the covered employee as if
the covered employee was temporarily totally disabled.
(2) If a covered employee refuses to accept vocational rehabilitation
services in accordance with an order of the Commission and the Commission determines
the refusal to be unreasonable, payments under paragraph (1) of this subsection are
forfeited for the period of refusal.
(3) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (III) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, AN
EMPLOYER OR ITS INSURER SHALL RETROACTIVELY PAY COMPENSATION TO A
COVERED EMPLOYEE AS IF THE COVERED EMPLOYEE WAS TEMPORARILY TOTALLY
DISABLED IF THE COVERED EMPLOYEE:
1. REACHED MAXIMUM MEDICAL IMPROVEMENT;
2. IS RECEIVING VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION
SERVICES; AND
3. DID NOT RECEIVE COMPENSATION AS IF THE
COVERED EMPLOYEE WAS TEMPORARILY DISABLED FOR THE PERIOD BETWEEN THE
DATE MAXIMUM MEDICAL IMPROVEMENT WAS ATTAINED AND THE DATE THE
COVERED EMPLOYEE BEGAN RECEIVING VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION SERVICES.
(II) THE COMPENSATION REQUIRED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I)
OF THIS PARAGRAPH IS IN ADDITION TO THE COMPENSATION REQUIRED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(III) AN EMPLOYER OR ITS INSURER MAY NOT BE REQUIRED TO
PAY COMPENSATION UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH FOR A PERIOD
OF MORE THAN 60 DAYS.
(c) (1) If a covered employee is required to live away from home in the course
of receiving vocational rehabilitation services, the employer or its insurer shall pay to the
covered employee money that:

HOUSE BILL 346
(i) is sufficient to maintain the covered employee while the covered
employee receives vocational rehabilitation services; but
(ii) does not exceed $40 a week.
(2) The employer or insurer shall make payments for maintenance under
paragraph (1) of this subsection in addition to the payment of compensation under
subsection (b) of this section.
(d) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, a covered
employee who resides at home during vocational rehabilitation training is not entitled to
reimbursement of transportation costs to and from the place of vocational training.
(2) In unusual cases the Commission may allow reasonable transportation
costs.
(e) For the purposes of this section, vocational rehabilitation training may not
last for more than 24 months.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall be construed to
apply only prospectively and may not be applied or interpreted to have any effect on or
application to any claim filed before the effective date of this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.